Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1353YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 30 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. As used in this subsection: 3 (1) âEligible attorneyâ means an attorney who is appointed 4 to an eligible case and who, at the time of such appointment, 5 has been licensed to practice law for fewer than ten years. 6 (2) âEligible caseâ means an appointment on or after July 1, 7 2025, by an Iowa court of an eligible attorney to represent a 8 person in a case pursuant to section 814.11 or 815.10. 9 (3) âEligible law firmâ means a law firm in this state that 10 has two or more attorneys that practice law in the law firm for 11 at least half of each tax year during which the law firm is 12 engaged in an eligible case. 13 b. (1) An eligible law firm may subtract, to the extent 14 included, the aggregated amount equal to the difference between 15 the total hours billed by the eligible attorney in the eligible 16 case multiplied by one hundred fifty dollars or the actual 17 hourly rate charged by the eligible law firm for that eligible 18 attorney for such a case, whichever is less, and the total 19 hours billed by the eligible attorney in the eligible case 20 multiplied by the hourly rate in effect for the eligible case 21 in section 815.7. 22 (2) The amount of the deduction allowed pursuant to this 23 subsection for an individual taxpayer of an eligible law 24 firm shall be calculated using the same percentage as the 25 taxpayerâs pro rata percentage share of the profits or losses 26 from the partnership, limited liability company, or subchapter 27 S corporation. 28 Sec. 2. Section 422.35, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 29 following new subsection: 30 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. a. As used in this subsection: 31 (1) âEligible attorneyâ means an attorney who is appointed 32 to an eligible case and who, at the time of such appointment, 33 has been licensed to practice law for fewer than ten years. 34 (2) âEligible caseâ means an appointment on or after July 1, 35 -1- LSB 1353YH (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 30 2025, by an Iowa court of an eligible attorney to represent a 1 person in a case pursuant to section 814.11 or 815.10. 2 (3) âEligible law firmâ means a law firm in this state that 3 has two or more attorneys that practice law in the law firm for 4 at least half of each tax year during which the law firm is 5 engaged in an eligible case. 6 b. An eligible law firm may subtract, to the extent 7 included, the aggregated amount equal to the difference between 8 the total hours billed by the eligible attorney in the eligible 9 case multiplied by one hundred fifty dollars or the actual 10 hourly rate charged by the eligible law firm for that eligible 11 attorney for such a case, whichever is less, and the total 12 hours billed by the eligible attorney in the eligible case 13 multiplied by the hourly rate in effect for the eligible case 14 in section 815.7. 15 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 16 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 17 or after that date. 18